California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(e) From the nominations received pursuant to subdivision (f), the Governor shall appoint two of the public members and the three licensed members qualified as provided in Section 8521. The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member, and their initial appointment shall be made to fill, respectively, the first and second public member vacancies that occur on or after January 1, 1983.

(f) (1) At least 60 days prior to
 the appointment by the Governor of a public member or licensed member to the board, the director shall solicit nominations to the board from interested parties by mailing them a notice and by posting a notice on the department’s Internet Web site. Interested parties include, but are not limited to, members or representatives from the structural pest control industry and organizations representing consumer, environmental, and real estate interests.

(2) All nominations shall be made in writing and shall include (A) the name and address of each nominee, (B) if an operator, his or her license number, and (C) the name, address, and affiliation, if any, of the nominator.

(3) The nominations shall be mailed to the director and shall be made available to the Governor and the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 238, Sec. 1.   (AB 1736)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

8523.

The board shall organize and elect a president who shall serve for one year.

The board shall meet annually during the month of October.

Special meetings may be called at any time by the president or by any three members of the board, upon notice for such time and in such manner as the board may provide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1027.)
-------------------------------------------

8524.

Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, for the performance of any duty, or the exercise of any power or authority of the board.

A vacancy on the board shall not impair the power of the remaining members to perform all duties and exercise all powers of the board providing the members remaining constitute a quorum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1821.)
-------------------------------------------

8525.

(a) The board, subject to the approval of the director, may, in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, adopt, amend, repeal, and enforce reasonably necessary rules and regulations relating to the practice of pest control and its various branches as established by Section 8560 and the administration of this chapter.

(b) The board shall consult with the Department of Pesticide Regulation when developing or adopting regulations that may affect the Department of Pesticide Regulation or a county agricultural commissioner’s responsibilities pursuant to Division 7 (commencing with Section 12500) of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 12.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

8526.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1645.)
-------------------------------------------

8527.

The board shall adopt and use a seal. The seal shall have the words “Structural Pest Control Board, State of California,” and such other devices as the board may desire, engrossed thereon. The registrar shall have the care and custody of the seal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1163.)
-------------------------------------------

8528.

(a) With the approval of the director, the board shall appoint a registrar, fix the registrar’s compensation, and prescribe the registrar’s duties.

(b) The registrar is the executive officer and secretary of the board.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2028, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 507, Sec. 2.   (SB 813)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

8529.

The registrar, with the approval of the board and of the director, and subject to the State Civil Service Act, may appoint and fix the compensation of such other assistants as may be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1382, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

8530.

The board, with the approval of the director, may establish the main office of the board, and branch offices of the board in any city of this State.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1163.)
-------------------------------------------

8531.

The registrar shall keep a complete record of the board’s actions, and shall maintain at the office of the board a complete index record of all applications for licenses and registrations issued, licenses renewed, and all revocations, cancellations, and suspensions of licenses and registrations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 25.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8531.5.

The board shall prepare minutes of its annual meeting and any special meetings, which shall be permanently maintained at the office of the registrar.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

8532.

Copies of all records and papers in the office of the board, certified by the registrar under the seal of the board shall be received in evidence in all courts of this State in all cases equally and with like effect as the originals of such papers and records.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1163.)
-------------------------------------------

8533.

Whenever funds are available for the purpose, the registrar, at the discretion of the board, may publish, or cause to be published, a roster of the individuals licensed and companies registered under the provisions of this chapter. A copy of such roster may be furnished to registered companies and such state agencies as the registrar may select, at such intervals as he or she deems necessary. Copies of the roster may be sold at a price fixed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 26.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8534.

Whenever funds are available for the purpose, the registrar, at the direction of the board, may publish and disseminate to individuals licensed and companies registered under this chapter and to public officials and other persons interested in the practice of pest control, such information relative to the administration and enforcement of this chapter as the board deems necessary to carry out its purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 27.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8535.

The registrar, and any member of the board, may administer oaths for the purpose of administering this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1163.)
-------------------------------------------

8536.

No manufacturer, his or her agents or employees, nor any person who is a consultant of or connected with any manufacturer, shall be appointed to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 238, Sec. 3.   (AB 1736)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Pesticides [8538. - 8538.]

8538.

(a) A registered structural pest control company shall provide the owner, or owner’s agent, and tenant of the premises for which the work is to be done with clear written notice which contains the following statements and information using words with common and everyday meaning:

(1) The pest to be controlled.

(2) The pesticide or pesticides proposed to be used and the active ingredient or ingredients.

(3) “State law requires that you be given the following information: CAUTION—PESTICIDES ARE TOXIC CHEMICALS. Structural Pest Control Companies are registered and regulated by the Structural Pest
 Control Board, and apply pesticides which are registered and approved for use by the Department of Pesticide Regulation and the United States Environmental Protection Agency. Registration is granted when the state finds that, based on existing scientific evidence, there are no appreciable risks if proper use conditions are followed or that the risks are outweighed by the benefits. The degree of risk depends upon the degree of exposure, so exposure should be minimized.

“If within 24 hours following application you experience symptoms similar to common seasonal illness comparable to the flu, contact your physician or poison control center (telephone number) and your pest control company immediately.” (This statement shall be modified to include any other symptoms of overexposure which are not typical of influenza.)

“For further information, contact any of the following: Your Pest Control Company (telephone number); for Health
 Questions—the County Health Department (telephone number); for Application Information—the County Agricultural Commissioner (telephone number), and for Regulatory Information—the Structural Pest Control Board (telephone number and address).”

(4) If a contract for periodic pest control has been executed, the frequency with which the treatment is to be done.

(b) In the case of Branch 1 applications, the notice prescribed by subdivision (a) shall be provided at least 48 hours prior to application unless fumigation follows inspection by less than 48 hours.

In the case of Branch 2 or Branch 3 registered company applications, the notice prescribed by subdivision (a) shall be provided no later than prior to application.

In either case, the notice shall be given to the owner, or owner’s agent, and
 tenant, if there is a tenant, in at least one of the following ways:

(1) First-class or electronic mail, if an electronic mail address has been provided.

(2) Posting in a conspicuous place on the real property.

(3) Personal delivery.

If the building is commercial or industrial, a notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place, unless the owner or owner’s agent objects, in addition to any other notification required by this section.

The notice shall only be required to be provided at the time of the initial treatment if a contract for periodic service has been executed. If the pesticide to be used is changed, another notice shall be required to be provided in the manner previously set forth herein.

(c) Any person or licensee who, or registered company which, violates any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as set forth in Section 8553.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 14.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Application of the Chapter [8550. - 8557.]

8550.

(a) It is unlawful for any person to advertise, to engage in, or offer to engage in the business or practice of structural pest control, as defined in Section 8505, unless he or she is licensed under this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an unlicensed person may solicit pest control work on behalf of a structural pest control company only if the company is registered pursuant to this chapter, and the unlicensed individual does not perform or offer to perform any act for which an operator, field representative, or applicator license is required pursuant to this chapter. As used in this subdivision, to “solicit pest control work” means to introduce consumers to a registered company and the services it provides, to
 distribute advertising literature, and to set appointments on behalf of a licensed operator or field representative.

(c) It is unlawful for an unlicensed person, soliciting pest control work on behalf of a registered structural pest control company pursuant to subdivision (b), to perform or offer to perform any act for which an operator, field representative, or applicator license is required, including, but not limited to, performing or offering pest control evaluations or inspections, pest identification, making any claims of pest control safety or pest control efficacy, or to offer price quotes other than what is provided and printed on the company advertising or literature, or both.

(d) It is also unlawful for any unlicensed person to offer any opinion, or to make any recommendations, concerning the need for structural pest control work in general, or in connection with a
 particular structure.

(e) It is unlawful for any firm, sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, association, or other organization or combination thereof to engage or offer to engage in the practice of structural pest control, unless registered in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 8610).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 572, Sec. 9.   (SB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8551.

It is unlawful for any unlicensed person to perform fumigation with dangerous or lethal fumigating chemicals in any public structure, including rooming houses, or households when used as public structures, hotels, apartment houses, or any part thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1027.)
-------------------------------------------

8551.5.

Except as provided in this chapter, an unlicensed individual in the employ of a registered company shall not apply any pesticides included in Branch 2 or Branch 3. However, an individual may, for 90 days from the date of employment, apply pesticides for the purposes of training under the direct supervision of a licensed field representative or operator employed by the company. This direct supervision means in the presence of the licensed field representative or operator at all times. The 90-day time period may not be extended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 16.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8552.

It is unlawful for any person to advertise or represent in any manner that any pest control work, in whole or in part, has been done upon any structure, unless the work has been performed by a registered company, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 430, Sec. 36.   (AB 181)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

8553.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, or who conspires with another person to violate any provision of this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 572, Sec. 10.   (SB 1481)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

8554.

No individual engaged in the business or acting in the capacity of an operator may bring or maintain an action in any court of this state for the collection of compensation for the performance of any act or contract without alleging and proving that he or she was a duly licensed operator at all times during the performance of such act or contract.

No firm, partnership, corporation, association or other organization or combination thereof engaged in the practice of structural pest control may bring or maintain an action in any court of this state for the collection of compensation for the performance of any act or contract without alleging and proving that it was a duly registered company at all times during the performance of the act or contract.

Nothing herein shall prohibit the bringing or maintaining an action for the collection of compensation in the event of a suspension or revocation of a license or company registration by the board, if the order of suspension or revocation authorized the performance of the act or work, compensation for which the action is brought or maintained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 32.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8555.

This chapter does not apply to:

(a) Public utilities operating under the regulations of the Public Utilities Commission, except to work performed upon property of the utilities not subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission or work done by the utility for hire.

(b) Persons engaged only in agricultural pest control work under permit or license by the Department of Pesticide Regulation or a county agricultural commissioner.

(c) Pest control performed by persons upon property that they own, lease or rent, except that the persons shall be subject to the limitations imposed by Article 3 of this chapter.

(d) Governmental agencies, state, federal, city, or county officials, and their employees while officially engaged.

(e) Authorized representatives of an educational institution or state or federal agency engaged in research or study of pest control, or engaged in investigation or preparation for expert opinion or testimony. A professional engaging in research, study, investigation, or preparation for expert opinion or testimony on his or her own behalf shall comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(f) Certified architects and registered civil engineers, acting solely within their professional capacity, except that they shall be subject to the limitations imposed by Article 3 of this chapter.

(g) Persons engaged in the live capture and removal or exclusion of vertebrate pests, bees, or wasps from a structure without the use of pesticides, provided those persons maintain insurance coverage as described in Section 8692. “Vertebrate pests” include, but are not limited to, bats, raccoons, skunks, and squirrels, but do not include mice, rats, or pigeons. This section does not exempt a person from the provisions of Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 718, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

8556.

(a) Licensed contractors acting in their capacity as such, may remove and replace any structure or portions of a structure damaged by wood destroying pests or organisms if that work is incidental to other work being performed on the structure involved or if that work has been identified by a structural pest control inspection report. Licensed contractors acting in their capacity as such may apply wood preservatives directly to end cuts and drill holes of pressure treated wood, and to foundation wood as required by building codes, as well as to fencing and decking, by brush, dip, or spray method and need not obtain a license under this chapter for performance of that work, provided a disclosure in the following form is submitted to the customer in writing: “The application of a wood preservative is intended to prevent the establishment and flourishing of organisms which can deteriorate wood. If you suspect pest infestation or infection, contact a registered structural pest control company prior to the application of a wood preservative.”

These exemptions do not authorize the performance of any other acts defined in Section 8505.

(b) A licensed contractor may contract for the performance of any soil treatment pest control work to eliminate, exterminate, control, or prevent infestations or infections of pests or organisms in the ground beneath or adjacent to any existing building or structure or in or upon any site upon which any building or structure is to be constructed, but the actual performance of any such work must be done by a registered structural pest control company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 983, Sec. 10.4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8557.

No city, county, or city and county shall prohibit a person or group of persons, authorized by the board by a license, certificate, or other such means under this chapter to engage in a particular business, from engaging in that business, occupation, or profession or any portion thereof as authorized in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 99, Sec. 1.   (AB 417)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Issuance of Licenses [8560. - 8572.]

8560.

(a) Licenses issued to operators, field representatives, or applicators shall be limited to the branch or branches of pest control for which the applicant has qualified by application and examination.

(b) For the purpose of delimiting the type and character of work authorized by the various branch licenses, the practice of pest control is classified into the following branches:

(1) Branch 1. Fumigation. The practice relating to the control of household and wood-destroying pests or organisms by fumigation with poisonous or lethal
 gases.

(2) Branch 2. General pest. The practice relating to the control of household pests, excluding fumigation with poisonous or lethal gases.

(3) Branch 3. Termite. The practice relating to the control of wood-destroying pests or organisms by the use of insecticides, or structural repairs and corrections, excluding fumigation with poisonous or lethal gases.

(c) The board may issue a license for a combination of two or more branches for which an applicant qualifies under the provisions of this chapter, and the combination license shall be considered one license.

(d) Unless
 otherwise authorized by the board, all examinations shall be supplied by the board. All examinations shall be kept for a period of one year, upon the expiration of which these records may be destroyed on order of the board. Each applicant for license as an operator or a field representative shall be designated by a number instead of by name, and the identity thereof shall not be disclosed until the examinations are graded. A person shall not be admitted to the examination room except members of the board, the examining personnel, and the applicants.

(e) The board shall make rules and regulations for the purpose of securing fair, impartial, and proper examinations.

(f) Licensees may be licensed in other branches upon complying with the requirements for qualification and by examination in those other branches. A failure of the licensee to pass examination in the other branch or
 branches shall not have any effect on existing licenses.

(g) The examination shall be in each of the subjects specified in the branch or branches relating to the respective applications. A license according to the applications shall be granted to any applicant who shall make a general average of not less than 70 percent on each of the subjects of the branch or branches.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 17.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8561.

Any individual 18 years of age or over may apply for a license as an operator.

The applicant shall possess the qualifications and be examined as hereinafter prescribed. The applicant shall apply to the board for the issuance of an operator’s license within one year of passing the examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1401, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

8562.

(a) To obtain an original operator’s license, an applicant shall submit to the registrar an application containing the statement that the applicant desires the issuance of an operator’s license under the terms of this chapter.

(b) The application shall be made on forms prescribed by the board and issued by the registrar in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board, and shall contain the following:

(1) The name of the applicant.

(2) Proof satisfactory to the board that the applicant has had actual experience for a period of not less than the
 time specified opposite the branches of pest control listed below in the employ of a registered company in the State of California in the particular branch or branches of pest control for which the applicant desires to be licensed, or the equivalent of that experience:Branch 12 yearsBranch 22 yearsBranch 34 years(c) For the purpose of this subdivision one year shall equal 1,600 hours of actual
 experience in the field.

(d) A designation of the branch or branches for which the application is made.

(e) The fees prescribed by this chapter.

(f) No operator’s license shall be issued to an individual under 18 years of age.

(g) Effective January 1, 1993, an operator’s license shall not be issued to an individual unless that individual has been licensed as a field representative in the branch in which the individual has applied for an operator’s license for a period of at least one year, in the case of Branches 1 and 2, or for a period of at least two years for Branch 3, or has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board that he or she has the equivalent of that training and experience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 18.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8563.

Any individual 18 years of age or over may apply for a license as field representative.

The applicant shall possess the qualifications and be examined as hereinafter prescribed. The applicant shall apply to the board for the issuance of a field representative’s license within one year from the date the applicant passes the examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1401, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

8564.

(a) To obtain an original field representative’s license, an applicant shall submit to the registrar an application containing a statement that the applicant desires the issuance of a field representative’s license under the terms of this chapter.

(b) The application shall be made on a form prescribed by the board and issued by the registrar in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board, and shall contain the following:

(1) The length of time during which the applicant has engaged in any work relating to pest control.

(2) The name and place
 of business of the person who last employed him or her.

(3) The name of the person by whom the applicant is employed.

(4) The name of the registered company by which the applicant is to be employed.

(5) The fees prescribed by this chapter.

(c) The board shall not accept any application for a field representative’s license in Branch 1 unless the applicant submits proof satisfactory to the board that he or she has had six months’ training and experience in the practice of fumigating with poisonous or lethal gases under the immediate supervision of an individual licensed to practice fumigating, or the equivalent of that training and experience.

(d) The board shall not accept any application
 for a field representative’s license in Branch 2 unless the applicant submits proof satisfactory to the board that he or she has had training and experience in the practice of pesticide application, Branch 2 pest identification and biology, pesticide application equipment, and pesticide hazards and safety practice under the immediate supervision of an operator or field representative licensed in Branch 2, or the equivalent of that training and experience.

(e) The board shall not accept any application for a field representative’s license in Branch 3 unless the applicant submits proof satisfactory to the board that he or she has had training and experience in the practice of pesticide application, Branch 3 pest identification and biology, pesticide application equipment, pesticide hazards and safety practices, structural repairs, and structural inspection procedures and report writing under the immediate supervision of an operator or field
 representative licensed in Branch 3, or the equivalent of that training and experience.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 19.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8564.5.

(a) Any individual 18 years of age or older may apply for a license as an applicator.

(b) The board shall ascertain by written examination that an applicant for a license as applicator in Branch 2 or Branch 3 has sufficient knowledge in pesticide equipment, pesticide mixing and formulation, pesticide application procedures and pesticide label directions.

(c) Passage of the written examination authorizes an individual to apply any chemical substance in Branch 2 or Branch 3.

(d) The board may charge a fee for any examination required by this section in an
 amount sufficient to cover the reasonable regulatory cost of administering the examination, but not to exceed the amount set forth in subdivision (k) of Section 8674.

(e) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit an applicator, authorized to apply any chemical substance in Branch 2 or Branch 3 before January 1, 1995, from acting as an applicator pursuant to that authorization. Upon expiration of the authorization, an applicator’s license shall be required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 304, Sec. 2.   (AB 1685)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8564.6.

(a) To obtain an original applicator’s license, an applicant shall submit to the registrar an application containing a statement that the applicant requests the issuance of an applicator’s license under the terms of this chapter.

(b) The application shall be made on a form prescribed by the board and issued by the registrar in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board and shall contain the following:

(1) The name of the registered company by which the applicant is to be employed.

(2) The fee prescribed by this
 chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 20.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8565.

The board shall ascertain by examination that an applicant for a license as operator is qualified in the use and understanding of all of the following:

(a) The English language, including reading and writing.

(b) The building and safety laws of the state and any of its political subdivisions, if the branch or branches of pest control for which he or she is applying, require that knowledge.

(c) The labor laws of the state.

(d) The provisions of this chapter.

(e) Pesticides used in pest control, if the branch license or licenses for which he or she is applying, require that knowledge.

(f) The theory and practice of the branch or branches of pest control in which the applicant desires to be licensed.

(g) Other state laws, safety or health measures, or practices that are reasonably within the scope of structural pest control in the various branches, including an applicant’s knowledge of the requirements regarding health effects and restrictions on applications, as set forth in Section 8538.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 21.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8565.5.

(a) An applicant for a Branch 1 operator’s license shall demonstrate to the board that he or she has passed satisfactorily board-approved courses in the following areas:

(1) Pesticides.

(2) Pest identification and biology.

(3) Contract law.

(4) Rules and regulations.

(5) Business practices.

(6) Fumigation safety.

(b) An applicant for a Branch 2 operator’s license shall demonstrate to the board that he or she has passed satisfactorily board-approved courses in the following areas:

(1) Pesticides.

(2) Pest identification and biology.

(3) Contract law.

(4) Rules and regulations.

(5) Business practices.

(c) An applicant for a Branch 3 operator’s license shall demonstrate to the board that he or she has
 passed satisfactorily board-approved courses in the following areas:

(1) Pesticides.

(2) Pest identification and biology.

(3) Contract law.

(4) Rules and regulations.

(5) Business practices.

(6) Construction repair and preservation techniques.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 354, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

8566.

The board shall ascertain by examination that an applicant for a license as field representative is qualified in the use and understanding of the following:

(a) The safety laws of the state, if the branch or branches of pest control for which he or she is applying, require that knowledge.

(b) The provisions of this chapter.

(c) Pesticides used in pest control, if the branch or branches of pest control for which he or she is applying, require that knowledge.

(d) The theory and practice of pest control in the branch
 or branches thereof for which the applicant desires to be licensed.

(e) Other state laws, safety or health measures, or practices as are reasonably within the scope of structural pest control in the various branches.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 560, Sec. 23.   (SB 1244)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

8566.5.

An individual shall be permitted to hold only one license in the same branch at the same time.

If an individual who holds an operator’s license requests to be licensed as a field representative or applicator, he or she may apply for a field representative’s license or applicator’s license and shall be granted the license without examination, if he or she surrenders his or her operator’s license to the board, and provided that no disciplinary action has been initiated against the operator’s license prior to the date of
 the individual’s application for a field representative’s license or applicator’s license.

If an individual who holds a field representative’s license requests to be licensed as an applicator, he or she may apply for an applicator’s license and he or she shall be granted the license without examination, if he or she surrenders his or her field representative’s license to the board, and if no disciplinary action has been initiated against the field representative’s license prior to the date of the individual’s application for an applicator’s license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 306, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8567.

(a) Should a field representative or applicator change his or her employment, or should an operator enter the employ of a registered company, or being already employed by a registered company change his or her employment, or being employed by a registered company leave that employment and enter the pest control business on his or her own behalf, he or she shall notify the registrar on a form prescribed by the board and issued by the registrar in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board. The registrar shall register the change in his or her records.

(b) If a field representative, operator, or applicator fails to notify the registrar within 30 days of the date a change of
 employment occurs, a registered company may notify the registrar, on a form
 prescribed by the board, that the field representative, operator, or applicator is no longer associated with the registered company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 573, Sec. 43.   (SB 800)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

8568.

After a hearing the board may deny a license or a company registration unless the applicant makes a showing satisfactory to the board that the applicant, if an individual, has not, or if the applicant is a company applying for a company registration, that its manager and each of its officers, directors, employees, members and partners have not:

(a) Committed any act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(b) While unlicensed or not registered, knowingly committed or aided and abetted the
 commission of any act for which a license or company registration is required under this chapter.

(c) While acting as a partner, officer, managing employee, or qualifying manager of a firm, partnership, or corporation, had knowledge of and participated in the commission of any act resulting in the suspension or revocation of a license or company registration.

When a hearing is held under this section it shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all of the powers granted therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1348, Sec. 42.   Operative January 1, 1987, by Sec. 97 of Ch. 1348.)
-------------------------------------------

8569.

In addition to the partner or other individual designated as the qualifying manager for a registered company which is organized as a partnership, if any of the company’s partners desire to actively engage in pest control on behalf of the partnership each shall be required to qualify for and to be licensed as an operator or field representative.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit any partner who is duly qualified and licensed in one or more of the branches of pest control designated in Section 8560, from representing the
 partnership in any other branch of pest control for which the partnership is registered, except that he or she may actively engage in pest control as an operator or field representative only in the branch for which he or she is qualified and licensed.

Upon being licensed as an operator or field representative, the other partner may engage in pest control only on behalf of the partnership of which he or she is a member, as long as he or she remains a partner thereof, but he or she may become associated with another partnership, or with a firm or corporation, in a capacity other than as a qualifying manager.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 270, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8570.

In addition to the officer or other individual designated as the qualifying manager for a registered company which is organized as an association or corporation, if any of the company’s other officers desire to actively engage in pest control in behalf of the association or corporation, each shall be required to qualify for and to be licensed as an operator or field representative.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit any officer of such corporation who is duly qualified and licensed in one or more of the branches of pest
 control designated in Section 8560, from representing the corporation in any other branch of pest control for which the corporation is registered, except that he or she may actively engage in pest control as an operator or field representative only in the branch for which he or she is qualified and licensed.

Upon being licensed as an operator or field representative, the officer may engage in pest control only on behalf of the association or corporation of which he or she is an officer, so long as he or she remains an officer thereof, but he or she may become associated with another association or corporation, or with a firm or partnership, in a capacity other than as a qualifying manager.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 270, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

8571.
